District of Columbia statutes.
9-1113.03

Capital grant assistance.

The Transit Authority, for the purpose of effecting the acquisition of the mass transit bus system or systems as contemplated by this subchapter, together with such improvements or replacement of acquired equipment and facilities as may be found necessary or desirable by the Secretary of Transportation (hereafter in §§ 9-1113.03 to 9-1113.05 referred to as the “Secretary”) in conjunction with such acquisition and within a reasonable time thereafter, not to exceed 6 months, is eligible for capital grant assistance pursuant to § 3 of the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964. For this purpose, the Transit Authority shall be considered a “local public body” within the meaning of that section and, accordingly, the Secretary may authorize and approve capital grant assistance to the Transit Authority in the maximum amount provided for in the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964 toward the cost of acquisition of such bus system or systems, including the cost of improvements to or replacement of acquired equipment and facilities approved by the Secretary in conjunction with such acquisition. Such assistance shall be provided from funds available to the Urban Mass Transportation Administration of the Department of Transportation.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1002, Pub. L. 91-517, title III, § 301

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1113.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2473.
1973 Ed., § 1-1463.

References in Text

“Section 3 of the Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964” was formerly codified at 49 U.S.C. § 1602. See now, generally, 49 U.S.C. § 5309.